District of Columbia statutes.
5-1309

Protection of emergency 2-way radio communications — Forfeiture of equipment.

(a)

Any 2-way radio and related equipment used to commit a violation of §§ 5-1306 to 5-1309 shall be subject to forfeiture.

(b)

Property subject to forfeiture under §§ 5-1306 to 5-1309 may be seized by law-enforcement officials, as designated by the Mayor, upon process issued by the Superior Court of the District of Columbia having jurisdiction over the property, or without process if authorized by other law.

History

Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-105, § 5, 33 DCR 1162

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-1109.